pt-BR: Eletrônicos > Acessórios para eletrônicos > Divisores e comutadores de áudio e vídeo > Divisores e chaves DisplayPort: Divisores DisplayPort; Chaves DisplayPort
en: Electronics > Electronics Accessories > Audio & Video Splitters & Switches > DisplayPort Splitters & Switches: DisplayPort Splitters; DisplayPort Switches
fi: Elektroniikka > Sähkötarvikkeet > AV-jakajat ja -kytkimet > DisplayPort-jakajat ja -kytkimet: DisplayPort-jakajat; DisplayPort-kytkimet
tr: Elektronik > Elektronik Alet Aksesuarları > Ses ve Görüntü Ayırıcıları ve Anahtarları > DisplayPort Bölücüler ve Anahtarlar: DisplayPort Bölücüler; DisplayPort Anahtarlar
sl-SI: Elektronika > Elektronski dodatki > Avdio in video razdelilniki in preklopniki > DisplayPort razdelilniki in preklopniki: DisplayPort razdelilniki; DisplayPort preklopniki
sk-SK: Elektronika > Elektronické príslušenstvo > Rozbočovače a prepínače zvuku a videa > DisplayPort rozdeľovače a prepínače: DisplayPort rozdeľovače; DisplayPort prepínače
pl: Elektronika > Akcesoria elektroniczne > Rozdzielacze i przełączniki do przesyłania obrazu i dźwięku > Rozdzielacze i przełączniki DisplayPort: Rozdzielacze DisplayPort; Przełączniki DisplayPort
nb: Elektronikk > Elektronikktilbehør > Lyd- og videosplittere og -brytere > DisplayPort-splittere og -brytere: DisplayPort-splittere; DisplayPort-brytere
el: Ηλεκτρονικά > Αξεσουάρ ηλεκτρονικών συσκευών > Διαχωριστές & διακόπτες ήχου & βίντεο > Διαχωριστές & διακόπτες DisplayPort: Διαχωριστές DisplayPort; Διακόπτες DisplayPort
zh-CN: 电子产品 > 电子配件 > 音频和视频分配器和切换器 > DisplayPort 分路器和切换器: DisplayPort 分路器; DisplayPort 切换器
lt-LT: Elektronika > Elektronikos priedai > Garso ir vaizdo skirstytuvai ir jungikliai > DisplayPort skirstytuvai ir jungikliai: DisplayPort skirstytuvai; DisplayPort jungikliai
cs: Elektronika > Elektronika – příslušenství > AV rozbočovače a přepínače > DisplayPort rozbočovače a přepínače: DisplayPort rozbočovače; DisplayPort přepínače
hr-HR: Elektronika > Pribor za elektroniku > Audio i video razdjelnici i sklopke > Razdjelnici i prekidači za DisplayPort: Razdjelnici za DisplayPort; Prekidači za DisplayPort
pt-PT: Eletrónica > Acessórios eletrónicos > Splitters e interrutores de áudio e vídeo > Divisores e comutadores displayport: Divisores displayport; Comutadores displayport
ja: 電子機器 > 電気製品関連用品・PC周辺機器 > AVスプリッター・スイッチ > DisplayPortスプリッター・スイッチャー: DisplayPortスプリッター; DisplayPortスイッチャー
es: Electrónica > Accesorios electrónicos > Divisores y conmutadores de audio y vídeo > Divisores y conmutadores DisplayPort: Divisores DisplayPort; Conmutadores DisplayPort
ro-RO: Electronice > Accesorii electronice > Splittere și comutatoare audio și video > Splittere și switch-uri DisplayPort: Splittere DisplayPort; Switch-uri DisplayPort
th: อิเล็กทรอนิกส์ > อุปกรณ์อิเล็กทรอนิกส์ > สวิตช์และตลับแยก AV > ตัวแยกและสวิตช์ DisplayPort: ตัวแยกสัญญาณ DisplayPort; สวิตช์ DisplayPort
vi: Thiết bị điện tử > Phụ kiện thiết bị điện tử > Bộ chia và công tắc âm thanh và hình ảnh > Bộ tách và công tắc DisplayPort: Bộ tách DisplayPort; Công tắc DisplayPort
zh-TW: 電子器材 > 電子配件 > AV 分配器/切換器 > DisplayPort 分配器與切換器: DisplayPort 分配器; DisplayPort 切換器
ko: 전자기기 > 전자기기 부대용품 > 오디오 및 비디오 스플리터/스위치 > DisplayPort 스플리터 및 스위치: DisplayPort 스플리터; DisplayPort 스위치
nl: Elektronica > Accessoires voor elektronica > Audio-/videosplitters en -schakelaars > DisplayPort splitters en switches: DisplayPort splitters; DisplayPort switches
sv: Elektronik > Elektroniktillbehör > Kabeldelare och omkopplare för video och ljud > DisplayPort-fördelare och omkopplare: DisplayPort-fördelare; DisplayPort-omkopplare
hu: Elektronika > Elektronikai kiegészítők > Audio- és videoelosztók és -kapcsolók > DisplayPort-elosztók és -kapcsolók: DisplayPort-elosztók; DisplayPort-kapcsolók
fr: Appareil électronique > Accessoires électroniques > Répartiteurs et commutateurs audio et vidéo > Répartiteurs et commutateurs DisplayPort: Répartiteurs DisplayPort; Commutateurs DisplayPort
ru: Электроника > Аксессуары для электроники > Разветвители и коммутаторы аудио- и видеосигналов > Разветвители и переключатели DisplayPort: Разветвители DisplayPort; Переключатели DisplayPort
da: Elektronik > Elektronik – tilbehør > Lyd og video – fordelere og omskiftere > DisplayPort – fordelere og omskiftere: DisplayPort – fordelere; DisplayPort – omskiftere
it: Elettronica > Accessori dispositivi elettronici > Splitter e interruttori audio e video > Splitter e switch DisplayPort: Splitter DisplayPort; Switch DisplayPort
de: Elektronik > Elektronisches Zubehör > Audio- und Video-Splitter & -Switches > DisplayPort-Splitter und -Switches: DisplayPort-Splitter; DisplayPort-Switches
bg-BG: Електроника > Аксесоари за електроника > Аудио- и видеосплитери и превключватели > DisplayPort сплитери и превключватели: DisplayPort сплитери; DisplayPort превключватели